Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 77. Venture Capital Act of 1994

§ 57-77-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the “Venture Capital Act of 1994.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 650, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1994).

§ 57-77-2.
Legislative intent.

The Legislature finds that the Venture Capital Act of 1994, Sections 57-77-1 through 57-77-39, Mississippi Code of 1972, has not been implemented in accordance with the legislative intent. The Legislature finds that the Venture Capital Act of 1994 needs to be amended for the purpose of clarifying the legislative intent and for the further purpose of ensuring public trust in the venture capital loan program by providing safeguards in the operation of the program and over the proper administration of the use of public funds. The Legislature finds that persons are purporting to serve on the Magnolia Capital Corporation Board of Directors and the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation Board of Directors in violation of the legislative intent of the Venture Capital Act of 1994. Pursuant to Section 178 of the Mississippi Constitution of 1890, the Legislature finds that it is in the public interest to amend the charters of incorporation of the Magnolia Capital Corporation and the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation which were authorized to be formed under the provisions of the Venture Capital Act of 1994, and the amendments made to Sections 57-77-9 and 57-77-11 by Chapter 563, Laws of 1998, shall be amendments to the charters of incorporation of the Magnolia Capital Corporation and the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 563, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1998).

§ 57-77-3.
Purpose of chapter; entities as instrumentalities of the state; sovereign immunity.

It is the purpose of this chapter to establish the Magnolia Capital Corporation, the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation and the Magnolia Venture Capital Fund Limited Partnership for the purposes of increasing the rate of capital formation; stimulating new growth-oriented business formations; creating new jobs for Mississippi; developing new technology; enhancing tax revenue for the state; and supplementing conventional business financing. The Magnolia Capital Corporation, the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation, and the Magnolia Venture Capital Fund Limited Partnership shall be instrumentalities of the State of Mississippi and their operations and activities shall be subject to review by the State Auditor of Public Accounts, the Attorney General of Mississippi, the Mississippi Ethics Commission, the Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review, and any other state officer or agency as provided by law. Funds obtained from the special fund in the State Treasury known as the Venture Capital Fund and any earnings on such amounts, which are held and disbursed by the Magnolia Capital Corporation, the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation and/or the Magnolia Venture Capital Fund Limited Partnership, except funds invested by private limited partners, shall remain, and shall be considered to be, public funds. Funds loaned by the department pursuant to Section 57-77-17, and all earnings on such funds shall remain, and shall be considered to be, public funds. Except as provided in Section 57-77-33(7), it is, and has always been, the intent of the Legislature that nothing in this chapter shall be construed to waive the sovereign immunity of the State of Mississippi or the department pursuant to either state law or the Eleventh Amendment to the United States Constitution. It is, and has always been, the intent of the Legislature that no action by the State of Mississippi or by the department, or by any officer or agent of the State of Mississippi or of the department, shall be considered a waiver of the sovereign immunity of the State of Mississippi or the department pursuant to either state law or the Eleventh Amendment to the United States Constitution. It is, and has always been, the intent of the Legislature that the entering into of any contract, loan agreement, pledge agreement, or other instrument by the State of Mississippi or the department shall not be considered a waiver of the sovereign immunity of the State of Mississippi pursuant to either state law or the Eleventh Amendment to the United States Constitution. It is, and has always been, the intent of the Legislature that the sovereign immunity of the State of Mississippi pursuant to either state law or the Eleventh Amendment to the United States Constitution may only be waived by express authorization set forth in an enactment of the Mississippi Legislature.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 650, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 563, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1998).

§ 57-77-5.
Definitions.

The following words shall have the meaning ascribed herein unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Fund” means the Magnolia Venture Capital Fund Limited Partnership, a limited partnership, established and operated as described in this chapter.

“Corporation” means the Magnolia Capital Corporation.

“Qualified investment” means a qualified interest, which interest is purchased solely for cash in an amount not less than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for individuals; and not less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) for corporations.

“General partner” means the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation.

“Qualified interest” means, in the case of the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation, a general partnership interest in the fund and, in the case of all other persons, a limited partnership interest in the fund.

“State tax liability” means a taxpayer’s total income tax liability that is incurred under the Mississippi Income Tax Law before applying the credits provided by Section 27-7-22.11.

“Taxpayer” means any individual, corporation, partnership, trust or other entity that has any state tax liability and has made a qualified investment.

“Venture capital” means investments in either common stock, preferred stock, or bonds convertible to either common or preferred stock, or options, warrants or rights to receive any of the foregoing, or any other similar investment in or loan to a Mississippi business.

“Mississippi business” means a corporation, general partnership, limited partnership, joint venture, trust, proprietorship or any other similar entity or organization which is either established and operating, or will be established to operate, in Mississippi.

“Start-up business” means a Mississippi business which is in the first thirty-six (36) months of providing goods or services in the ordinary course of business or a Mississippi business which qualified as a start-up business under this definition at the time it entered the venture capital fund portfolio.

“Program” means the venture capital loan program established in this chapter.

“Seller” means the State Bond Commission.

“Department” means the Mississippi Department of Economic and Community Development.

“General Fund” means the General Fund of the State of Mississippi.

“Loan” means a loan by the department to Magnolia Capital Corporation in accordance with this chapter.

“Appointing authority” means the Governor or the Lieutenant Governor, as appropriate, in appointing members to the board of directors of the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 650, § 3; Laws, 1998, ch. 563, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1998).

§ 57-77-7.
Taxpayer entitlement to credit against state tax liability.

A taxpayer is entitled to a credit, determined in accordance with Section 27-7-22.11, which must be applied against the state tax liability which may be imposed on the taxpayer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 650, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1994).

§ 57-77-9.
Formation of Magnolia Capital Corporation; officers and directors; bylaws and articles of incorporation; general powers and duties; meetings; replacement of directors; dissolution of Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation and fund.

The Magnolia Capital Corporation shall be formed and operated pursuant to the laws of this state. The articles of incorporation, bylaws and any other agreement relating to the organization or operation of the corporation must comply with the provisions set forth in this section. The corporation will be a not-for-profit corporation.

The executive director of the department shall cause the corporation to be formed, and he shall designate the incorporators. The initial board of directors shall consist of thirteen (13) members, all of whom will be appointed by the executive director of the department. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (2), members of the initial board of directors shall serve staggered terms as follows: four (4) for terms of five (5) years each, three (3) for terms of four (4) years each, three (3) for terms of three (3) years each and three (3) for terms of two (2) years each. The terms of the members of the board of directors in place (including any initial directors and successors) before April 17, 1998, shall expire on April 17, 1998, and such persons shall cease to serve on the board of directors and shall relinquish all powers and control of the corporation and assets of the corporation. From and after April 17, 1998, the board of directors shall consist of three (3) members who shall be the State Treasurer, the Attorney General and Secretary of State. If the position on the board of directors held by the State Treasurer, Attorney General or Secretary of State, becomes vacant through death, resignation or otherwise, the position will be filled by the person acting as State Treasurer, Attorney General or Secretary of State, as appropriate, until the Office of State Treasurer, Attorney General or Secretary of State, as appropriate, is filled in the manner provided by law. The directors may not receive per diem.

The articles of incorporation shall provide that the name of the corporation is the “Magnolia Capital Corporation,” and the registered agent shall be designated by the executive director of the department. The corporation’s existence begins upon filing of the articles of incorporation. The corporation’s existence is perpetual, unless dissolved as provided herein. The general nature of the business of the corporation is to serve as the sole stockholder of the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation. Consistent with the provisions of this chapter, the bylaws, the organizational minutes, the election of officers, and any other actions appropriate or necessary for the organization and operation of the corporation shall be of that form and content as determined by the board of directors. Nothing contained in this chapter may prohibit the board of directors of the corporation from altering, amending or otherwise modifying the articles of incorporation, bylaws or any other agreement governing the corporation as otherwise permitted under the laws of this state, except that the method of electing directors may not be amended, altered or otherwise modified or restricted; except that the general nature of the business of the corporation may not be amended, altered or otherwise modified or restricted; and except that the corporation may be dissolved, merged or otherwise cease to exist pursuant to the appropriate vote of the board of directors. The executive director of the department may expend any discretionary funds he has available and considers appropriate for the purpose of organizing the corporation.

In addition to other powers and duties, the corporation may take all actions it deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, and the board of directors shall meet at least one (1) time on a quarterly basis to assess the venture capital loan program and whether or not the provisions of this chapter are being complied with. In addition to any other powers and duties, if the corporation determines, as evidenced by a majority vote of the board of directors, that any member of the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation board of directors is not performing the duties of such member in a manner consistent with the provisions of this chapter, the corporation may recommend to the appropriate appointing authority that such member of the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation board of directors be replaced.

As soon as legally permissible after April 17, 1998, the corporation shall direct the board of directors of the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation to dissolve the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation and the fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 650, § 6; Laws, 1998, ch. 563, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1998).

§ 57-77-11.
Formation of Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation; officers and directors; bylaws and articles of incorporation; general powers and duties; replacement of directors; dissolution of Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation and fund.

The Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation shall be formed and operated pursuant to the laws of this state. The articles of incorporation, bylaws and any other agreement relating to the organization or operation of the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation must comply with the provisions set forth in this section. The Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation will be a for profit corporation.

The executive director of the department shall cause the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation to be formed, and he shall designate the incorporators. The initial board of directors shall consist of five (5) members, all of whom will be appointed by the executive director of the department. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (2), members of the initial board of directors shall serve staggered terms as follows: three (3) for terms of five (5) years each and two (2) for terms of three (3) years each. The terms of the members of the board of directors in place (including any initial directors and successors), shall expire on April 17, 1998, and such persons shall cease to serve on the board of directors and shall relinquish all powers and control of the corporation and assets of the corporation. From and after April 17, 1998, the board of directors shall be composed of five (5) members, three (3) of whom shall be appointed by the Governor and two (2) of whom shall be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor. Members of the initial board, appointed from and after April 17, 1998, shall serve staggered terms as follows: one (1) member appointed by the Governor for a term of one (1) year, one (1) member appointed by the Governor for a term of two (2) years, one (1) member appointed by the Governor for a term of three (3) years, one (1) member appointed by the Lieutenant Governor for a term of four (4) years, and one (1) member appointed by the Lieutenant Governor for a term of five (5) years. If the position of an initial director, appointed from and after April 17, 1998, becomes vacant through death, resignation or otherwise, the appropriate appointing authority shall appoint another person to complete the unexpired term. If the position of a successor director becomes vacant through death, resignation or otherwise, the appropriate appointing authority shall appoint another person to complete the unexpired term. After the terms of the initial directors, appointed from and after April 17, 1998, expire, successors shall be chosen by the appropriate appointing authority and shall serve for terms of five (5) years. The appropriate appointing authority may remove a member of the board of directors if, in the opinion of the appointing authority, the board member is not performing his or her duties in a manner consistent with the provisions of this chapter. Members of the initial board, appointed from and after April 17, 1998, and successor directors are eligible to succeed themselves if reappointed by the appropriate appointing authority. The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint two (2) nonvoting advisory members to the board. Such nonvoting advisory members shall serve for terms concurrent with the term of the Speaker of the House of Representatives. If the position of an advisory member becomes vacant through death, resignation or otherwise, the Speaker shall appoint another person to complete the unexpired term. Members of the board shall receive a per diem as provided in Section 25-3-69, for each day or fraction thereof in performance of their duties, and shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in Section 25-3-41. Members of the board shall receive no compensation other than that provided in this subsection (2). If a director is a full-time state employee, he may not receive per diem.

The articles of incorporation shall provide that the name of the entity is the “Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation,” and the registered agent shall be designated by the executive director of the department. The Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation’s existence begins upon filing of the articles of incorporation. The Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation’s existence is perpetual, unless dissolved as provided herein. The Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation is authorized to issue shares of a number, class and par or no-par value as provided in its articles of incorporation. The general nature of the business of the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation is to serve as general partner of the Magnolia Venture Capital Fund Limited Partnership, to provide venture capital to Mississippi businesses, to provide financing to high-growth oriented businesses, and to undertake any acts appropriate or necessary to carry out the foregoing. Consistent with the provisions of this chapter, the bylaws, the organizational minutes, the election of officers, the issuance of any stock of the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation, and any other actions appropriate or necessary for the organization and operation of the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation shall be of that form and content as determined by the board of directors. Nothing contained in this chapter may prohibit the shareholders or board of directors of the corporation from altering, amending or otherwise modifying the articles of incorporation, bylaws or any other agreement governing the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation as otherwise permitted under the laws of this state, except that the method of electing directors shall not be amended, altered or otherwise modified; except that the general nature of the business of the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation may not be amended, altered or otherwise modified or restricted; and except that the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation may be dissolved, merged or otherwise cease to exist pursuant to the appropriate vote of the board of directors and shareholders. The executive director of the department may expend any discretionary funds he has available and considers appropriate for the purpose of organizing the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation and promoting the sale of the qualified investments.

The Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation shall cause the fund to be formed as a limited partnership. The partnership agreement relating to the organization and operation of the fund must be of that form and content as determined by the board of directors of the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation. The Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation shall be the sole general partner of the fund, and the initial limited partner shall be a person or entity designated by the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation’s board of directors. Additional limited partners may be admitted to the fund in accordance with the terms of the partnership agreement.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (8), the fund shall raise funds to provide financing to high-growth oriented businesses. A “high-growth oriented business” is a corporation, general partnership, limited partnership, joint venture, trust, proprietorship, or other similar entity or organization which is expected to experience significant sales growth over the subsequent five-year period. All investments made from investment monies raised by the fund, for which the tax credit provided by this chapter is allowed and for which the tax credit is made available by the fund in the prospectus or offering, must be made to provide venture capital to Mississippi businesses, this venture capital to be used primarily for the purpose of enhancing the production capacity of these businesses or their ability to do business in Mississippi. Seventy percent (70%) of these investment monies acquired by the fund for which the tax credit is allowed and available must be invested to provide venture capital financing of start-up businesses. The remaining thirty percent (30%) may be invested as the general partner of the fund determines to provide capital to Mississippi businesses.

No business may be transacted or indebtedness incurred (not including indebtedness authorized to be incurred in Sections 57-77-15 and 57-77-17) except that as is incidental to the organization of the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation or of the fund or to obtaining subscriptions to or payment for qualified interests, until consideration of Four Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($4,500,000.00) has been paid as a capital investment by a private investor or private investors to Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation or to the fund. It is the intent of the Legislature that the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation and/or the fund shall always maintain a capital investment from a private investor or private investors of at least Four Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($4,500,000.00). If the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation and/or the fund fail to obtain a capital investment from a private investor or private investors of at least Four Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($4,500,000.00), or if after having obtained such investment, the total of the private capital investments ever falls below Four Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($4,500,000.00), Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation and the fund shall suspend making investments and incurring indebtedness, and, if so directed by Magnolia Capital Corporation, the board of directors of Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation shall dissolve Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation and the fund in the manner provided by law and direct that all sums, causes of action and other assets held by the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation and the fund be paid and/or assigned to the State Treasurer who shall administer such sums and other assets as provided by law.

If directed by Magnolia Capital Corporation pursuant to Section 57-77-9(5), the board of directors of Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation shall dissolve Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation and the fund in the manner provided by law and direct that all sums, causes of action and other assets held by the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation and the fund be paid and/or assigned to the State Treasurer who shall administer such sums and other assets as provided by law.

All securities issued by either the Mississippi Venture Capital Corporation or the fund shall be exempt securities with regard to the Mississippi Uniform Securities Act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 650, § 7; Laws, 1998, ch. 563, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1998).

§ 57-77-13.
Exemption from taxation and license fees of Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation.

Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation, but not the shareholders thereof, is exempt from all state income taxes and corporate license fees.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 650, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1994).

§ 57-77-15.
Magnolia Capital Corporation to apply to department for loan.

The Magnolia Capital Corporation shall make application for a loan to the department in a form satisfactory to the department.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 650, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1994).

§ 57-77-17.
Terms and conditions of loan to Magnolia Capital Corporation.

The department shall lend funds under this chapter to Magnolia Capital Corporation in accordance with the following terms and conditions:

Loan funds received by Magnolia Capital Corporation in accordance with this chapter shall remain, and shall be considered to be, public funds and shall be used for the purpose of providing venture capital to Mississippi businesses through the Mississippi Venture Capital Fund Limited Partnership;

The loan agreement between the department and Magnolia Capital Corporation shall contain language necessary to effect the escrow of a portion of the loan in an account for the benefit of the department which, when the monies are invested in zero coupon bonds for a period not to exceed fifteen (15) years, shall mature at a value equal to or greater than one hundred percent (100%) of the total principal amount loaned to Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation;

The interest rate on the loan to Magnolia Capital Corporation shall be set by the executive director of the department; and

Funds received by the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation and/or the Magnolia Venture Capital Fund Limited Partnership shall be subject to any loan agreement made between the department and the Magnolia Capital Corporation pursuant to this chapter; and, in the event of default on such loan agreement, such funds shall, upon demand of the department, be returned to the Venture Capital Fund in the State Treasury, regardless of whether or not the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation or the Magnolia Venture Capital Fund Limited Partnership was a party to any loan agreement evidencing any such loan.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 650, § 10; Laws, 1998, ch. 563, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1998).

§ 57-77-19.
Assistance of Magnolia Capital Corporation with program compliance.

The department shall assist the Magnolia Capital Corporation with such corporation’s compliance with the program provided for in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 650, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1994).

§ 57-77-21.
Reports by Magnolia Capital Corporation.

Magnolia Capital Corporation shall submit the following reports to the department:

An annual audit of loan funds received in connection with the program;

Quarterly reports describing all venture capital assistance provided to businesses by Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation and the fund, such reports to include at least the following: a description of the business receiving assistance, the project to be assisted and the purpose of such assistance; a description of each loan and equity investment, including the terms and conditions thereof and use of the venture fund’s assistance by the business; history of the assistance pool, including amounts expended for administration and management, principal amount of equity investments, losses, loans and other relevant data.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 650, § 12; Laws, 1998, ch. 563, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1998).

§ 57-77-23.
Authority of corporations to engage professional services.

Subject to the provisions of this section, Magnolia Capital Corporation and Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation are hereby authorized to engage legal counsel, accountants, financial advisors, appraisers, consultants and others as needed in connection with providing venture capital to businesses pursuant to this chapter, and to charge the costs of these services to the businesses receiving such assistance or charge the proceeds of such assistance therefor. However, no such professional services may be engaged unless done so through action taken by a validly appointed board of directors having the legal authority to engage such services. To the extent required by the department, such professional services shall be engaged on a statewide program basis.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 650, § 13; Laws, 1998, ch. 563, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1998).

§ 57-77-25.
Adoption of eligibility criteria, timetable and report forms governing Magnolia Capital Corporation participation in venture capital loan program; adoption of applications, forms, procedures and requirements by Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation.

The department shall adopt and publish the eligibility criteria for Magnolia Capital Corporation to participate in the program as set forth in this chapter, a timetable and process for review of applications from Magnolia Capital Corporation, and program report forms, all in accordance with this chapter; provided, however, that Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation shall recommend to Magnolia Capital Corporation the approval of assistance under this chapter, and Magnolia Capital Corporation shall have sole authority over the approval of assistance provided under this chapter, and Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation shall have sole authority over the management of the assistance provided under this chapter.

Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation shall prepare and adopt such uniform applications, forms, procedures and requirements for use in connection with the program as it deems necessary and appropriate.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 650, § 14; Laws, 1998, ch. 563, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1998).

§ 57-77-27.
Certification of nondiscrimination as condition to assistance to business.

No assistance shall be provided to a business under this chapter unless the business certifies to the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation, in a form satisfactory to the department, that it will not discriminate against any employee or against any applicant for employment because of race, religion, color, national origin, sex or age.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 650, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1994).

§ 57-77-29.
Creation of Venture Capital Fund; deposits and disbursements; disposition of funds for repayment of bonds; use of remaining monies; receipt and use of monetary and nonmonetary assets.

There is hereby created a special fund in the State Treasury, to be known as the Venture Capital Fund, out of which loans to Magnolia Capital Corporation authorized in connection with the program shall be disbursed. All monies received by issuance of bonds to carry out the purposes of this chapter shall be deposited into the Venture Capital Fund. No funds in the Venture Capital Fund, no funds transferred from the Venture Capital Fund to the department for subsequent transfer to the Magnolia Capital Corporation, no funds transferred to the Magnolia Capital Corporation, and no funds transferred by the Magnolia Capital Corporation to the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation and/or the Magnolia Venture Capital Fund Limited Partnership may be used to provide financing for, or to contract for goods or services with, any business in which a director, employee, or limited partner of the Magnolia Capital Corporation, the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation or the Magnolia Venture Capital Fund Limited Partnership, or the spouse of any such director, employee or limited partner has a direct or indirect interest. No funds in the Venture Capital Fund, no funds transferred from the Venture Capital Fund to the department for subsequent transfer to the Magnolia Capital Corporation, no funds transferred to the Magnolia Capital Corporation, and no funds transferred by the Magnolia Capital Corporation to the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation and/or the Magnolia Venture Capital Fund Limited Partnership may be used to provide financing for, or to contract for goods or services with, any business in which a person who has been engaged pursuant to Section 57-77-23 or the spouse of such person has a direct or indirect interest.

All funds repaid to the State Treasury under this chapter or designated hereunder for repayment of any bonds issued under this chapter shall be delivered to the State Treasurer for deposit in the State General Fund. Any monetary assets received pursuant to Section 57-77-11(6)(a) shall be applied to pay the debt service on the bonds issued under the Venture Capital Act of 1994, in accordance with the proceedings authorizing the issuance of such bonds and as directed by the State Bond Commission. Any nonmonetary assets shall be administered in the manner provided by law. Any monies remaining in the fund after it is utilized as provided for in this subsection (2) shall be deposited into the State General Fund.

Any monetary assets received pursuant to Section 57-77-11(6)(b) shall be applied to pay valid monetary obligations of the Magnolia Capital Corporation and the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation. Any nonmonetary assets shall be administered in the manner provided by law. Any monies remaining in the fund after it is utilized as provided in this subsection (3) shall be deposited as follows: (a) Six Million Four Hundred Thousand Dollars ($6,400,000.00) of such monies shall be deposited into the State General Fund and (b) the remainder of such monies shall be deposited into the Budget Contingency Fund created in Section 27-103-301.

Valid monetary obligations of the Magnolia Capital Corporation and the Magnolia Venture Capital Corporation shall not be impaired and shall be satisfied from the special fund created in this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 650, § 16; Laws, 1998, ch. 563, § 10; Laws, 2001, ch. 598, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 16, 2001.).

§ 57-77-31.
Redemption, repayment, purchase or cancellation of bonds and notes; appropriations for payment of principal and interest on bonds and notes; rate of interest on loans made using funds from Venture Capital Fund.

All bonds issued under the authority of this chapter shall be redeemed at maturity, together with all interest due, from time to time, on the bonds, and these principal and interest payments shall be paid from the general fund.

In the event that all or any part of the bonds and notes are purchased, they shall be canceled and returned to the loan and transfer agent as canceled and paid bonds and notes; and, thereafter, all payments of interest thereon shall cease and the canceled bonds, notes and coupons shall be destroyed as promptly as possible after cancellation but not later than two (2) years after cancellation. A certificate evidencing the destruction of the canceled bonds, notes and coupons shall be provided by the loan and transfer agent to the seller.

The State Treasurer shall determine and report to the Department of Finance and Administration and Joint Legislative Budget Office by September 1 of each year the amount of money necessary for the payment of the principal of and interest on outstanding obligations for the following fiscal year and the times and amounts of the payments. It shall be the duty of the Governor to include in every executive budget submitted to the Legislature full information relating to the issuance of bonds and notes under the provisions of this chapter and the status of the general fund for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds and notes.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the rate of interest on any loans made using funds from the Venture Capital Fund shall be in accordance with Section 57-77-17. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, the interest rate charged shall not be set such that the aggregate of the interest, penalties and other payments in connection with such assistance made using funds from the Venture Capital Fund will cause the bonds issued pursuant to this chapter to be deemed arbitrage bonds pursuant to Section 148 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and the regulations promulgated thereunder. In the case of assistance initially funded from the proceeds of notes and subsequently funded from renewal bonds and notes, the interest rate to be charged on the assistance shall be established in accordance with Section 57-77-17 upon the sale of bonds or notes, as the case may be, for such assistance.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 650, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1994).

§ 57-77-33.
Issuance of bonds and notes generally; terms, form, execution, etc., of bonds and notes.

The seller is authorized to borrow, on the credit of the state, money not exceeding the aggregate sum of Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00). Such borrowing may be evidenced by the issuance of bonds or notes, and the rate of interest on any such bonds or notes which are not subject to taxation shall not exceed the rates set forth in Section 75-17-101, Mississippi Code of 1972, for general obligation bonds.

As evidence of indebtedness authorized in this chapter, general or limited obligation bonds or notes of the state shall be issued from time to time to provide monies necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter for such total amount, in such form, in such denominations, payable in such currencies (either domestic or foreign or both), and subject to such terms and conditions of issue, redemption and maturity, rate of interest and time of payment of interest as the seller directs, except that such bonds shall mature or otherwise be retired in annual installments beginning not more than five (5) years from date thereof and extending not more than twenty (20) years from the date thereof.

All bonds and notes issued under authority of this chapter shall be signed by the chairman of the seller, or by his facsimile signature, and the official seal of the seller shall be affixed thereto, attested by the secretary of the seller.

All bonds and notes issued under authority of this chapter may be general or limited obligations of the state, and the full faith and credit of the State of Mississippi as to general obligation bonds, or the revenue derived from projects assisted as to limited obligation bonds, are hereby pledged for the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds and notes.

Such bonds and notes and the income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation in the State of Mississippi.

Bonds may be issued as coupon bonds or registered as to both principal and interest as the seller may determine. If interest coupons are attached, they shall contain the facsimile signature of the chairman and the secretary of the seller.

As to bonds issued hereunder and designated as taxable bonds by the seller, any immunity of the state to taxation by the United States government of interest on bonds or notes issued by the state is hereby waived.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 650, § 18, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1994).